Tennessee, session 114, SB1945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-141, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting the following:
(b) If after the defendant is released upon personal recognizance, an unsecured
personal appearance bond, or any other bond approved by the court, the defendant
violates a condition of release, is charged with an offense committed during the
defendant's release, or engages in conduct which results in the obstruction of the orderly
and expeditious progress of the trial or other proceedings, then the court may, upon the
filing of a written order and notice of hearing, temporarily revoke the defendant's bond
and order the defendant held without bail for no more than ten (10) days pending a bail
revocation hearing. Following a bail revocation hearing, if the court finds that the
defendant has violated a condition of bond, then the court may permanently revoke the
defendant's bond and order the defendant held without bail pending trial or without
release during trial.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1945
010887
- 1 -